src/morphology/stems/altstem-verbs.lexc
!! Verbs have no allomorphic variation per se, except for some assimilation and
!! variation of ð forms, but the stem variation is the same
!! as in nouns. The examples for verb stems are given for each class:
!! A infinitive's lative, e infinitive's inessive, indicative present 1st 
!! singular, indicative present 3rd singular, indicative past 1st singular, 
!! indicative past 3rd singular, conditional past 3rd singular, 
!! imperative 2nd plural, potential 1st singular, present passive, 
!! past passive, nut participle passive

LEXICON V_KAUNISTUA
!! The u stems have no stem variation:
!! € kaunistua
!! € kaunistuessa
!! € kaunistun
!! € kaunistuu
!! € kaunistuin
!! € kaunistui
!! € kaunistuisi
!! € kaunistukaa
!! € kaunistunen
!! € kaunistutaan
!! € kaunistuttiin
!! € kaunistuttu
0    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0    V_BACK_3SG_U  ;
0    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;
0   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:t   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:t   V_BACK_TUPCP_0    ;

LEXICON V_PUNOA
!! The o stems have no stem variation:
!! € punoa
!! € punoessa
!! € punon
!! € punou
!! € punoin
!! € punoi
!! € punoisi
!! € punokaa
!! € punonen
!! € punotaan
!! € punottiin
!! € punottu
0    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0    V_BACK_3SG_U  ;
0    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;
0   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:t   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:t   V_BACK_TUPCP_0    ;

LEXICON V_SÄILÖÄ
!! The o stems have no stem variation:
!! € punoa
!! € punoessa
!! € punon
!! € punou
!! € punoin
!! € punoi
!! € punoisi
!! € punokaa
!! € punonen
!! € punotaan
!! € punottiin
!! € punottu
0    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0    V_FRONT_EINF    ;
0    V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0    V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0    V_FRONT_3SG_Ö  ;
0    V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST   ;
0    V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST ;
0    V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE ;
0   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N ;
0   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:t   V_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:t   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0    ;

LEXICON V_ÄLLISTYÄ
!! The y stems have no stem variation:
!! € ällistyä
!! € ällistyessä
!! € ällistyn
!! € ällistyy
!! € ällistyin
!! € ällistyi
!! € ällistyisi
!! € ällistykää
!! € ällistynen
!! € ällistytään
!! € ällistyttiin
!! € ällistytty
0    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0    V_FRONT_EINF    ;
0    V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0    V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0    V_FRONT_3SG_Y  ;
0    V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST   ;
0    V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST ;
0    V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE ;
0   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N ;
0   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:t   V_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:t   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0    ;

LEXICON V_HAUKKOA
!! € haukkoa
0:ko    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:ko    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:o    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ko    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ko    V_BACK_3SG_O  ;
0:o    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:ko    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:ko    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ko   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:ko   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:o   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:ot   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:ot   V_BACK_TUPCP_0    ;

LEXICON V_NUOKKUA
!! € nuokkua
0:ku    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:ku    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:u    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ku    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ku    V_BACK_3SG_U  ;
0:u    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:ku    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:ku    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ku   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:ku   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:u   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:ut   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:ut   V_BACK_TUPCP_0    ;

LEXICON V_KÄRKKYÄ
!! € kärkkyä
0:ky    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:ky    V_FRONT_EINF    ;
0:y    V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ky    V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ky    V_FRONT_3SG_Y  ;
0:y    V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:ky    V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST ;
0:ky    V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ky   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE ;
0:ky   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:y   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:yt   V_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:yt   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0    ;

LEXICON V_HARPPOA
!! € harppoa
0:po    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:po    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:o    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:po    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:po    V_BACK_3SG_O  ;
0:o    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:po    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:po    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:po   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:po   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:o   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:ot   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:ot   V_BACK_TUPCP_0    ;

LEXICON V_LOPPUA
!! € loppua
0:pu    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:pu    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:u    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:pu    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:pu    V_BACK_3SG_U  ;
0:u    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:pu    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:pu    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:pu   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:pu   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:u   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:ut   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:ut   V_BACK_TUPCP_0    ;

LEXICON V_LEPPYÄ
!! € leppyä
0:py    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:py    V_FRONT_EINF    ;
0:y    V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:py    V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:py    V_FRONT_3SG_Y  ;
0:y    V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:py    V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST ;
0:py    V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:py   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE ;
0:py   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:y   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:yt   V_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:yt   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0    ;

LEXICON V_KIVETTYÄ
!! € kivettyä
0:ty    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_EINF    ;
0:y    V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_3SG_Y  ;
0:y    V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ty   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE ;
0:ty   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:y   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:yt   V_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:yt   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0    ;

LEXICON V_VIITTOA
!! € hermottua
0:to    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:to    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:o    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:to    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:to    V_BACK_3SG_O  ;
0:o    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:to    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:to    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:to   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:to   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:o   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:tu   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:tu   V_BACK_TUPCP_0    ;

LEXICON V_HERMOTTUA
!! € hermottua
0:tu    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:tu    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:u    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:tu    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tu    V_BACK_3SG_U  ;
0:u    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:tu    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:tu    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:tu   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:tu   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:u   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:ut   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:ut   V_BACK_TUPCP_0    ;

LEXICON V_MÄIKYÄ
!! € mäikyä
0:ky    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:ky    V_FRONT_EINF    ;
0:y    V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ky    V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ky    V_FRONT_3SG_Y  ;
0:y    V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:ky    V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST ;
0:ky    V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ky   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE ;
0:ky   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:y   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:yt   V_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:yt   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0    ;

LEXICON V_TAKOA
!! € takoa
0:ko    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:ko    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:o    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ko    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ko    V_BACK_3SG_O  ;
0:o    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:ko    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:ko    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ko   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:ko   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:o   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:ot   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:ot   V_BACK_TUPCP_0    ;

LEXICON V_MAUKUA
!! € maukua
0:ku    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:ku    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:’u   V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ku    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ku    V_BACK_3SG_U  ;
0:’u   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:ku    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:ku    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ku   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:ku   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:’u  V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:’ut  V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:’ut  V_BACK_TUPCP_0    ;

LEXICON V_ELPYÄ
!! € elpyä
0:py    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:py    V_FRONT_EINF    ;
0:vy    V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:py    V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:py    V_FRONT_3SG_Y  ;
0:vy    V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:py    V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST ;
0:py    V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:py   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE ;
0:py   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:vy   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:vyt   V_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:vyt   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0    ;

LEXICON V_HIIPUA
!! € hiipua
0:pu    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:pu    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:vu    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:pu    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:pu    V_BACK_3SG_U  ;
0:vu    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:pu    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:pu    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:pu   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:pu   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:vu   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:vut   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:vut   V_BACK_TUPCP_0    ;

LEXICON V_SILPOA
!! € silpoa
0:po    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:po    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:vo    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:po    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:po    V_BACK_3SG_O  ;
0:vo    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:po    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:po    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:po   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:po   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:vo   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:vot   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:vot   V_BACK_TUPCP_0    ;

LEXICON V_KIETOA
!! € kietoa
0:to    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:to    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:do    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:to    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:to    V_BACK_3SG_O  ;
0:do    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:to    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:to    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:to   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:to   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:do   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:dot   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:dot   V_BACK_TUPCP_0    ;

LEXICON V_SILIYTYÄ
!! € siliytyä
0:ty    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_EINF    ;
0:dy    V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_3SG_Y  ;
0:dy    V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ty   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE ;
0:ty   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:dy   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:dyt   V_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:dyt   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0    ;

LEXICON V_ROHTUA
!! € rohtua
0:tu    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:tu    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:du    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:tu    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tu    V_BACK_3SG_U  ;
0:du    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:tu    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:tu    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:tu   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:tu   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:du   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:dut   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:dut   V_BACK_TUPCP_0    ;

LEXICON V_VINKUA
!! € vinkua
0:ku    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:ku    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:gu    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ku    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ku    V_BACK_3SG_U  ;
0:gu    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:ku    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:ku    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ku   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:ku   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:gu   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:gut   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:gut   V_BACK_TUPCP_0    ;

LEXICON V_PENKOA
!! € penkoa
0:ko    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:ko    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:go    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ko    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ko    V_BACK_3SG_O  ;
0:go    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:ko    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:ko    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ko   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:ko   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:go   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:got   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:got   V_BACK_TUPCP_0    ;

LEXICON V_TEMPOA
!! € tempoa
0:po    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:po    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:mo    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:po    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:po    V_BACK_3SG_O  ;
0:mo    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:po    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:po    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:po   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:po   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:mo   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:mot   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:mot   V_BACK_TUPCP_0    ;

LEXICON V_AMPUA
!! € ampua
0:pu    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:pu    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:mu    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:pu    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:pu    V_BACK_3SG_U  ;
0:mu    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:pu    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:pu    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:pu   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:pu   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:mu   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:mut   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:mut   V_BACK_TUPCP_0    ;
